Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-910
State Department of Education; assist public schools; secure funds, services, and commodities made available by federal government.

The State Department of Education shall cooperate with and assist the public schools and public educational institutions in securing funds, services, and commodities which may be made available to them by the federal government or its agencies.

Laws 1945, c. 239, § 1, p. 718;

Laws 1977, LB 548, § 7.